Utah statutes.
13-14-307.5.   Termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a recreational vehicle franchise agreement.

(1)  This section applies only to a recreational vehicle franchisee's termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of:

(a)  a recreational vehicle franchise; or

(b)  a recreational vehicle line-make.

(2) (a)  A recreational vehicle franchisee may, at any time and with or without good cause, terminate, cancel, or not renew its recreational vehicle franchise agreement or a recreational vehicle line-make by giving 30 days' prior written notice to the recreational vehicle franchisor.

(b)  A franchisee has the burden of showing that a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is for good cause.

(c)  Good cause for a franchisee's termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal is considered to exist if:

(i)  the franchisor is convicted of or enters a plea of nolo contendere to a felony;

(ii)  the business operations of the franchisor are:

(A)  abandoned; or

(B)  closed for 10 consecutive business days, unless the closing is due to an act of God, a strike, a labor difficulty, or another cause over which the franchisor has no control;

(iii)  the franchisor makes a misrepresentation that materially and adversely affects the business relationship with the recreational vehicle franchisee;

(iv)  a material violation of this chapter is not cured within 30 days after the franchisee gives 30 days' written notice of the violation to the recreational vehicle franchisor; or

(v)  the recreational vehicle franchisor:

(A)  becomes insolvent;

(B)  declares bankruptcy; or

(C)  makes an assignment for the benefit of creditors.

(3)  If the franchisee terminates, cancels, or does not renew the recreational vehicle franchise agreement or line-make for cause, the franchisor shall, at the franchisee's election and within 45 days after termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal, repurchase:

(a) (i)  all new, unaltered recreational vehicles, including demonstrators, that the franchisee acquired from the franchisor within 18 months before the date of the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal; and

(ii)  for a repurchase price equal to 100% of the original net invoice cost, including transportation, reduced by:

(A)  any applicable rebates and discounts to the franchisee; and

(B)  the cost to repair any damage to a repurchased recreational vehicle, if the vehicle is damaged after delivery to the franchisee but before repurchase occurs;

(b) (i)  all undamaged accessories and proprietary parts sold by the recreational vehicle franchisor to the franchisee within one year before termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal, if accompanied by the original invoice; and

(ii)  for a repurchase price equal to 100% of the original net invoice cost, plus an additional 5% of the original net invoice cost to compensate the franchisee for packing and shipping the returned accessories and parts to the franchisor; and

(c) (i)  any properly functioning diagnostic equipment, special tools, current signage, and other equipment and machinery that:

(A)  the franchisee purchased:

(I)  from the franchisor within five years before termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal; and

(II)  at the franchisor's request or because of the franchisor's requirement; and

(B)  are no longer usable in the normal course of the franchisee's ongoing business, as the franchisee reasonably determines; and

(ii)  for a repurchase price equal to 100% of the original net cost that the franchisee paid, plus any applicable shipping charges and sales taxes.

(4)  A recreational vehicle franchisor shall pay the franchisee all money due under Subsection (3) within 30 days after the franchisor's receipt of the repurchased items.

